North Carolina, session 2025, HB885.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-12(27) reads as rewritten:
"(27) Reporting Dropout Rates, Corporal Punishment, Suspensions, Expulsions,
and Alternative Placements. – The State Board shall report by March 15 of
each year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the
numbers of students who have dropped out of school, been subjected to
corporal punishment, been suspended, been expelled, been reassigned for
disciplinary purposes, or been provided alternative education services. The
data shall be reported in a disaggregated manner, reflecting the local school
administrative unit, race, gender, grade level, ethnicity, and disability status
of each affected student. Such data shall be readily available to the public. The
State Board shall not include students that have been expelled from school
when calculating the dropout rate. The Board shall maintain a separate record
of the number of students who are expelled from school and the reasons for
the expulsion."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-107.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-107.7. Discipline, corporal punishment, Discipline and homebound instruction.
(a) The policies and procedures for the discipline of students with disabilities shall be
consistent with federal laws and regulations.
(a1) Any corporal punishment administered on students with disabilities shall be
consistent with the requirements of G.S. 115C-390.4.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-276(r) reads as rewritten:
"(r) To Maintain Student Discipline. – The superintendent shall maintain student
discipline in accordance with Article 27 of this Chapter and shall keep data on each student to
whom corporal punishment was administered, who was suspended for more than 10 days, who
was reassigned for disciplinary reasons, or who was expelled. This data shall include the race,
*H885-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
gender, age, grade level, ethnicity, and disability status of each student, the duration of
suspension for each student, whether alternative education services were provided for each
student, and whether a student had multiple suspensions in that academic year."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-390.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-390.1. State policy and definitions.
…
(b) The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(6a) Intermediate-term suspension. – The exclusion for more than 20, but no more
than 42, cumulative school days of a student from school attendance for
disciplinary purposes from the school to which the student was assigned at the
time of the disciplinary action.
(6b) In-school suspension. – The exclusion of a student from the classroom for
disciplinary purposes while the student remains on school grounds.
(7) Long-term suspension. – The exclusion for more than 10 43 school days of a
student from school attendance for disciplinary purposes from the school to
which the student was assigned at the time of the disciplinary action. If the
offense leading to the long-term suspension occurs before the final quarter of
the school year, the exclusion shall be no longer than the remainder of the
school year in which the offense was committed. If the offense leading to the
long-term suspension occurs during the final quarter of the school year, the
exclusion may include a period up to the remainder of the school year in which
the offense was committed and the first semester of the following school year.
…
(9a) Reasonable attempt. – Initiating contact with a parent or guardian and, if
unsuccessful, documenting each attempt to contact the parent or guardian at
least once a day for a least three consecutive days. Documentation of
communication attempts shall include the means of communication, date, and
time. For the initial contact, school personnel must utilize at least two of the
following means of communication:
a. Telephone call.
b. Electronic communication, including email or text messaging.
c. Written communication, including certified mail or hand delivery to
the parent by school personnel.
…
(12) Short-term suspension. – The exclusion of a student from school attendance
for disciplinary purposes for up to 10 20 cumulative school days from the
school to which the student was assigned at the time of the disciplinary action.
…
(b1) Notice to a parent under this Article shall be written in plain language and easy to
understand. If the school is aware that a parent has a primary language other than English, the
school shall provide a copy of the written notice in both the primary language of the parent and
in English.
…."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-390.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-390.2. Discipline policies.
…
(d) Governing body policies shall not allow students to be long-term suspended or
expelled from school solely for truancy or tardiness offenses and shall not allow short-term
suspension of more than two days for such offenses.offenses. Governing boards are encouraged
to implement truancy and tardiness policies that focus on intervention strategies aimed at
Page 2 House Bill 885-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
addressing the root cause of absenteeism, promoting attendance through positive reinforcement
and engagement.
…
(h) Governing body policies shall include the procedures to be followed by school
officials in suspending, expelling, or administering corporal punishment to suspending or
expelling any student, which shall be consistent with this Article.
…
(j) Governing bodies of public school units are encouraged to include in their safe
schools plans, adopted pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.47, use research-based behavior management
programs that take positive approaches to improving student behaviors.
…
(n) Governing bodies of public school units shall adopt a policy for in-school suspension.
A student may not be placed in in-school suspension for more than five consecutive school days
per suspension period, for more than 15 suspension periods in a school year, or for more than 40
cumulative school days per school year. The school shall make a reasonable attempt to notify a
student's parent that the student has been assigned to in-school suspension within one hour of the
end of the school day during which the student was recommended for the suspension.
(o) Governing body policies shall not restrict physical activity, such as recess, as a form
of punishment.
(p) Governing body policies shall not require a student to be detained for disciplinary
purposes for more than one hour after the school day's official end.
(q) Governing body policies shall not authorize suspension for students in kindergarten
through third grade except when required by federal law. Suspension for students in these grades
is permitted for up to five school days per incident but only if the school administration, in
consultation with a school psychologist or other mental health professional, determines that there
is an imminent threat of serious harm to other students or staff that cannot be addressed through
interventions and supports. This subsection shall also apply to students enrolled in a
prekindergarten program run by a public school unit."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 115C-390.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-390.4. Corporal punishment.punishment prohibited.
(a) Each governing body of a public school unit shall determine whether corporal
punishment will be permitted in its public school unit. Notwithstanding a governing body's
prohibition on the use of corporal punishment, school personnel may use Corporal punishment
is prohibited. Use of physical restraint in accordance with federal law and G.S. 115C-391.1 and
reasonable use of force pursuant to G.S. 115C-390.3.G.S. 115C-390.3 shall not be considered
corporal punishment.
(b) To the extent that corporal punishment is permitted, the policies adopted for the
administration of corporal punishment shall include at a minimum the following:
(1) Corporal punishment shall not be administered in a classroom with other
students present.
(2) Only a teacher, principal, or assistant principal may administer corporal
punishment and may do so only in the presence of a principal, assistant
principal, or teacher who shall be informed beforehand and in the student's
presence of the reason for the punishment.
(3) A school person shall provide the student's parent with notification that
corporal punishment has been administered, and the person who administered
the corporal punishment shall provide the student's parent a written
explanation of the reasons and the name of the second person who was present.
(4) The school shall maintain records of each administration of corporal
punishment and the reasons for its administration.
House Bill 885-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) In no event shall excessive force be used in the administration of corporal
punishment. Excessive force includes force that results in injury to the child
that requires medical attention beyond simple first aid.
(6) Corporal punishment shall not be administered on a student whose parent or
guardian has stated in writing that corporal punishment shall not be
administered to that student. Parents and guardians shall be given a form to
make such an election at the beginning of the school year or when the student
first enters the school during the year. The form shall advise the parent or
guardian that the student may be subject to suspension, among other possible
punishments, for offenses that would otherwise not require suspension if
corporal punishment were available. If the parent or guardian does not return
the form, corporal punishment may be administered on the student.
(c) Each governing body of a public school unit shall report annually to the State Board
of Education, in a manner prescribed by the State Board of Education, on the number of times
that corporal punishment was administered. The report shall be in compliance with the federal
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and shall include the following:
(1) The number of students who received corporal punishment.
(2) The number of students who received corporal punishment who were also
students with disabilities and were eligible to receive special education and
related services under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,
20 U.S.C. § 1400, et seq.
(3) The grade level of the students who received corporal punishment.
(4) The race, gender, and ethnicity of the students who received corporal
punishment.
(5) The reason for the administration of the corporal punishment for each student
who received corporal punishment."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 115C-390.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-390.5. Short-term suspension.
…
(b) If a student's short-term suspensions accumulate to more than 10 days in a semester,
to the extent the principal has not already done so, he or she shall invoke the mechanisms
provided for in the applicable safe schools plan adopted pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.47(b)(5) and
(b)(6).A student may be placed on short-term suspension for no more than 10 consecutive school
days per suspension period and for no more than 20 cumulative school days per school year.
…."
SECTION 1.(h) G.S. 115C-390.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-390.6. Short-term suspension procedures.
…
(c) The principal shall provide notice to the student's parent of any short-term suspension,
including the reason for the suspension and a description of the alleged student conduct upon
which the suspension is based. The notice shall be given by the end of the workday during which
the suspension is imposed when reasonably possible, but in no event more than two days after
the suspension is imposed. The principal shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the parent of
the suspension within one hour of the end of the school day during which the student was
assigned short-term suspension. The notice shall be given by certified mail, telephone, facsimile,
e-mail, or any other method reasonably designed to achieve actual notice.
(d) If English is the second language of the parent, the notice shall be provided in the
parent's primary language, when the appropriate foreign language resources are readily available,
and in English, and both versions shall be in plain language and shall be easily understandable.
(e) A student is not entitled to appeal the principal's decision to impose a short-term
suspension to the superintendent or governing body of the public school unit. Further, such a
Page 4 House Bill 885-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
only if (i) the current period of suspension the student is appealing is for three days or more and
(ii) the student will have a cumulative 15 days or more of short-term suspension at the end of the
suspension period being appealed. The decision of the superintendent is not subject to judicial
review. Notwithstanding this subsection, the governing body, in its discretion, may provide
students an opportunity for a review or appeal of a short-term suspension to from the
superintendent or to the governing body."
SECTION 1.(i) Article 27 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following two new sections to read:
"§ 115C-390.6A. Intermediate-term suspension.
(a) A principal may recommend to the superintendent the intermediate-term suspension
of any student who willfully engages in conduct that violates a provision of the Code of Student
Conduct that authorizes intermediate-term suspension.
(b) A student may be placed on intermediate-term suspension for no more than 21
consecutive school days per suspension period and for no more than 42 cumulative school days
per school year.
(c) A student recommended for intermediate-term suspension shall be offered the
opportunity for a hearing consistent with the provisions of G.S. 115C-390.6B.
(d) Only the superintendent has the authority to intermediate-term suspend a student. If
the student recommended for intermediate-term suspension declines the opportunity for a
hearing, the superintendent shall review the circumstances of the recommended suspension.
Following such review, the superintendent may do any of the following:
(1) Impose the suspension if it is consistent with board policy.
(2) Impose another appropriate penalty authorized by board policy.
(3) Decline to impose any penalty.
(e) A student subject to intermediate-term suspension shall be provided the following:
(1) The opportunity to take instructional materials home for the duration of the
suspension.
(2) Upon request, the right to receive all missed assignments.
(3) The opportunity to take quarterly, semester, or grading period examinations
missed during the suspension period.
"§ 115C-390.6B. Intermediate-term suspension procedures.
(a) When a student is recommended by the principal for intermediate-term suspension,
the principal shall make a reasonable attempt to give written notice to the student's parent within
one hour of the end of the workday during which the suspension was recommended. The written
notice shall provide at least the following information:
(1) A description of the incident and the student's conduct that led to the
intermediate-term suspension recommendation.
(2) A reference to the provisions of the Code of Student Conduct that the student
is alleged to have violated.
(3) The specific process by which the parent may request a hearing to contest the
decision, including the number of days within which the hearing must be
requested.
(4) The process by which a hearing will be held, including, at a minimum, the
procedures described in G.S. 115C-390.8(e).
(5) Notice that the parent is permitted to retain an attorney to represent the student
in the hearing process.
(6) The extent to which the governing body policy permits the parent to have an
advocate, instead of an attorney, accompany the student to assist in the
presentation of his or her appeal.
(7) Notice that the parent has the right to review and obtain copies of the student's
educational records before the hearing.
House Bill 885-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) A reference to the governing body policy on the expungement of discipline
records as required by G.S. 115C-402.
(b) No intermediate-term suspension shall be imposed on a student until an opportunity
for a hearing has been offered to the student.
(c) To opt out of the hearing, the student must affirmatively decline the hearing in writing,
and the superintendent shall follow the procedures described in G.S. 115C-390.6A(d).
(d) If a hearing is not declined, it shall be held and a decision issued before an
intermediate-term suspension is imposed, in accordance with the following:
(1) If the student or parent requests a postponement of the hearing, or if the
hearing is requested beyond the time set for such request, the hearing shall be
scheduled, but the student shall not have the right to return to school pending
the hearing.
(2) The student and parent shall be given reasonable notice of the time and place
of the hearing. If neither the student nor parent appears for the hearing, the
parent and student are deemed to have waived the right to a hearing, and the
superintendent shall conduct the review required by G.S. 115C-390.6A(d).
(e) The hearing may be conducted by the superintendent or by a person or group of
persons appointed by the superintendent to serve as a hearing officer or hearing panel. The
superintendent shall not appoint an individual to serve as a hearing officer or on a hearing panel
who is under the direct supervision of the principal recommending suspension. If the hearing is
conducted by an appointed hearing officer or hearing panel, such officer or panel shall determine
the relevant facts and credibility of witnesses based on the evidence presented at the hearing.
Following the hearing, the superintendent shall make a final decision regarding the suspension.
The superintendent shall adopt the hearing officer's or panel's factual determinations unless they
are not supported by substantial evidence in the record.
(f) Intermediate-term suspension hearings shall be conducted in accordance with the
requirements of G.S. 115C-390.8(e).
(g) Following the issuance of the decision, the superintendent shall authorize the student's
return to school or impose the suspension reflected in the decision.
(h) A student may appeal an intermediate-term suspension decision to the local board of
education in accordance with G.S. 115C-45(c) and policies adopted by the governing body of the
public school unit. Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-45(c), a student's appeal to the governing body
of a decision upholding an intermediate-term suspension shall be heard and a final written
decision issued in not more than 30 calendar days following the request for such appeal.
(i) Nothing in this section shall compel school officials to release names or other
information that could allow the student or his or her representative to identify witnesses when
such identification could create a safety risk for the witness.
(j) A decision of the governing body of the public school unit to uphold the
intermediate-term suspension of a student is subject to judicial review in accordance with Article
4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The action must be brought within 30 days of the
governing body's decision. A person seeking judicial review shall file a petition in the superior
court of the county where the governing body made its decision. Local rules notwithstanding,
petitions for judicial review of an intermediate-term suspension shall be set for hearing in the
first succeeding term of superior court in the county following the filing of the certified copy of
the official record."
SECTION 1.(j) G.S. 115C-390.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-390.7. Long-term suspension.
…
(b) Before the superintendent's imposition of a long-term suspension, the student must be
provided an opportunity for a hearing consistent with G.S. 115C-390.8.
Page 6 House Bill 885-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) If the student recommended for long-term suspension declines the opportunity for a
hearing, the superintendent shall review the circumstances of the recommended long-term
suspension. Following such review, the superintendent (i) may impose the suspension if is it
consistent with board policies and appropriate under the circumstances, (ii) may impose another
appropriate penalty authorized by board policy, or (iii) may decline to impose any penalty.
…."
SECTION 1.(k) G.S. 115C-390.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-390.8. Long-term suspension procedures.
(a) When a student is recommended by the principal for long-term suspension, the
principal shall make a reasonable attempt to give written notice to the student's parent. The notice
shall be provided to the student's parent by parent within one hour of the end of the workday
during which the suspension was recommended when reasonably possible or as soon thereafter
as practicable. recommended. The written notice shall provide at least the following information:
(1) A description of the incident and the student's conduct that led to the long-term
suspension recommendation.
(2) A reference to the provisions of the Code of Student Conduct that the student
is alleged to have violated.
(3) The specific process by which the parent may request a hearing to contest the
decision, including the number of days within which the hearing must be
requested.
(4) The process by which a hearing will be held, including, at a minimum, the
procedures described in subsection (e) of this section.
(5) Notice that the parent is permitted to retain an attorney to represent the student
in the hearing process.
(6) The extent to which the governing body policy permits the parent to have an
advocate, instead of an attorney, accompany the student to assist in the
presentation of his or her appeal.
(7) Notice that the parent has the right to review and obtain copies of the student's
educational records before the hearing.
(8) A reference to the governing body policy on the expungement of discipline
records as required by G.S. 115C-402.
(b) Written notice may be provided by certified mail, fax, e-mail, or any other written
method reasonably designed to achieve actual notice of the recommendation for long-term
suspension. When school personnel are aware that English is not the primary language of the
parent or guardian, the notice shall be written in both English and in the primary language of the
parent or guardian when the appropriate foreign language resources are readily available. All
notices described in this section shall be written in plain English, and shall include the following
information translated into the dominant non-English language used by residents within the
public school unit:
(1) The nature of the document, i.e., that it is a long-term suspension notice.
(2) The process by which the parent may request a hearing to contest the
long-term suspension.
(3) The identity and phone number of a school employee that the parent may call
to obtain assistance in understanding the English language information
included in the document.
(c) No long-term suspension shall be imposed on a student until an opportunity for unless
a formal hearing is provided to the student. If a hearing is timely requested, it shall be held and a
decision issued before a long-term suspension is imposed, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection. The student and parent shall be given reasonable notice of the time and place of the
hearing.provided in accordance with the following:
House Bill 885-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) If no hearing is timely requested, the superintendent shall follow the
procedures described in G.S. 115C-390.7(c).
(2) If the student or parent requests a postponement of the hearing, or if the
hearing is requested beyond the time set for such request, the hearing shall be
scheduled, but the student shall not have the right to return to school pending
the hearing.
(3) The student and the parent shall be given reasonable notice of the time and
place of the hearing. If neither the student nor parent appears for the scheduled
hearing, after having been given reasonable notice of the time and place of the
hearing, the parent and student are deemed to have waived the right to a
hearing and the superintendent shall conduct the a review required by
G.S. 115C-390.7(c).of the recommendation in accordance with the
requirements of G.S. 115C-390.6A(d).
…."
SECTION 1.(l) G.S. 115C-390.11(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Upon recommendation of the superintendent, a governing body of a public school
unit may expel any student 14 years of age or older whose continued presence in school
constitutes a clear threat to the safety of other students or school staff. Prior to the expulsion of
any student, the governing body shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the student's
continued presence in school constitutes a clear threat to the safety of other students or school
staff. The student shall be given reasonable notice of the recommendation in accordance with
G.S. 115C-390.8(a) and (b), as well as reasonable notice of the time and place of the scheduled
hearing. The following provisions apply:
…."
SECTION 1.(m) G.S. 115C-391.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-391.1. Permissible use of seclusion and restraint.
…
(j) Notice, Reporting, and Documentation. –
(1) Notice of procedures. – Each governing body of a public school unit shall
provide copies of this section and all governing body policies developed to
implement this section to school personnel and parents or guardians at the
beginning of each school year.
(2) Notice of specified incidents:
a. School personnel shall promptly notify the principal or principal's
designee of:
1. Any use of aversive procedures.
2. Any prohibited use of mechanical restraint.
3. Any use of physical restraint resulting in observable physical
injury to a student.
4. Any prohibited use of seclusion or seclusion that exceeds 10
minutes or the amount of time specified on a student's behavior
intervention plan.
b. When a principal or principal's designee has personal knowledge or
actual notice of any of the events described in this subdivision, the
principal or principal's designee shall promptly notify the student's
parent or guardian and will provide the name of a school employee the
parent or guardian can contact regarding the incident.
(3) As used in subdivision (2) of this subsection, "promptly notify" means by the
end of the workday during which the incident occurred when reasonably
possible, but in no event later than the end of following workday.
Page 8 House Bill 885-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The principal or the principal's designee shall make a reasonable attempt to
notify a parent or guardian of the student shall be provided with a written
incident report for any incident reported under this section within a reasonable
period of time, but in no event later than 30 days after the incident. one hour
of the end of the school day during which the incident occurred.
(4a) A parent notified under subdivision (4) of this subsection shall receive a
written incident report within a reasonable amount of time but in no event later
than 30 days after the incident. The written incident report shall include:
a. The date, time of day, location, duration, and description of the
incident and interventions.
b. The events or events that led up to the incident.
c. The nature and extent of any injury to the student.
d. The name of a school employee the parent or guardian can contact
regarding the incident.
…."
SECTION 1.(n) G.S. 115C-391.2 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c) The school shall make a reasonable attempt to notify a student's parent before any
student search or interrogation is conducted and, if unsuccessful, within one hour of the end of
the school day during which the search was conducted."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 6-21.4 is repealed.
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law, applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 school year, and does not apply to civil actions arising from the use of
corporal punishment prior to the effective date of this act.
SECTION 3. Part 10B of Article 3 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-168.10L. Disciplinary actions in early child care settings.
All early child care providers, including public school units, as defined in G.S. 115C-5, and
private schools offering prekindergarten services in this State, shall annually report to the
Department of Public Instruction detailed data on suspensions and expulsions. The data shall
include (i) the number of suspension or expulsion actions taken, (ii) the reasons for the suspension
or expulsion, (iii) the duration of the suspension or expulsion, and (iv) the demographic
information of the students suspended or expelled, appropriately redacted to adhere to applicable
privacy laws. The Department of Public Instruction shall analyze the data collected pursuant to
this section to identify patterns and inform strategies for minimizing suspensions and expulsions,
while emphasizing non-exclusionary disciplinary practices. The Department of Public
Instruction shall issue any specific reporting guidelines and formats on data collected under this
section, consistent with any federal law and data the Department of Public Instruction may
currently collect on disciplinary actions in early child care settings."
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to assist the Department in developing and distributing guidance to public
school units on how to implement the requirements of this act.
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 885-First Edition Page 9